Illinois, session 104th, SB3409.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12024 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12024)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 5-12024. Energy storage systems.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Energy storage system" means a facility with an aggregate 12energy capacity that is greater than 500 1,000 kilowatts and 13that is capable of absorbing energy and storing it for use at a 14later time, including, but not limited to, electrochemical and 15electromechanical technologies. "Energy storage system" does 16not include technologies that require combustion. "Energy 17storage system" also does not include energy storage systems 18associated with commercial solar energy facilities or 19commercial wind energy facilities as defined in Section 205-12020.21    "Excused service interruption" means any period during 22which an energy storage system does not store or discharge 23electricity and that is planned or reasonably foreseeable for   SB3409- 2 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1standard commercial operation, including any unavailability 2caused by a buyer; storage capacity tests; system emergencies; 3curtailments, including curtailment orders; transmission 4system outages; compliance with any operating restriction; 5serial defects; and planned outages.6    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 7ownership interest in an energy storage system, regardless of 8whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 9rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 10construction and operation of the facility and (ii) a person 11who, at the time the facility is being developed, is acting as 12a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 13permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 14operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 15will own or operate the facility.16    "Force majeure" means any event or circumstance that 17delays or prevents an energy storage system from timely 18performing all or a portion of its commercial operations if 19the act or event, despite the exercise of commercially 20reasonable efforts, cannot be avoided by and is beyond the 21reasonable control, whether direct or indirect, of, and 22without the fault or negligence of, a facility owner or 23operator or any of its assignees. "Force majeure" includes, 24but is not limited to:25        (1) fire, flood, tornado, or other natural disasters 26    or acts of God;  SB3409- 3 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1        (2) war, civil strife, terrorist attack, or other 2    similar acts of violence;3        (3) unavailability of materials, equipment, services, 4    or labor, including unavailability due to global supply 5    chain shortages;6        (4) utility or energy shortages or acts or omissions 7    of public utility providers;8        (5) any delay resulting from a pandemic, epidemic, or 9    other public health emergency or related restrictions; and10        (6) litigation or a regulatory proceeding regarding a 11    facility.12    "NFPA" means the National Fire Protection Association.13    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 14not a participating property.15    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 16located on nonparticipating property and that exists and is 17occupied on the date that the application for a permit to 18develop an energy storage system is filed with the county.19    "Occupied community building" means a school, place of 20worship, day care facility, public library, or community 21center that is occupied on the date that the application for a 22permit to develop an energy storage system is filed with the 23county in which the building is located.24    "Participating property" means real property that is the 25subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 26the owner of the real property and that provides the facility   SB3409- 4 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 2property for the purpose of constructing an energy storage 3system or supporting facilities.4    "Protected lands" means real property that is: (i) subject 5to a permanent conservation right consistent with the Real 6Property Conservation Rights Act; or (ii) registered or 7designated as a nature preserve, buffer, or land and water 8reserve under the Illinois Natural Areas Preservation Act.9    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 10substations, switchyard, access roads, meteorological towers, 11storage containers, and equipment associated with the 12generation, storage, and dispatch of electricity by an energy 13storage system.14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 15, if a county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 16zoning under Section 5-12007, then a county may establish 17standards for energy storage systems in areas of the county 18that are not within the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality. 19The standards may include all of the requirements specified in 20this Section but may not include requirements for energy 21storage systems that are more restrictive than specified in 22this Section or requirements that are not specified in this 23Section.24    (c) A county shall may require the energy storage facility 25to comply with the version of NFPA 855 "Standard for the 26Installation of Stationary Energy Storage Systems" in effect   SB3409- 5 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1on the effective date of this amendatory Act or any successor 2standard issued by the NFPA in effect on the date of siting or 3special use permit approval. A county may not include 4requirements for energy storage systems that are more 5restrictive than NFPA 855 "Standard for the Installation of 6Stationary Energy Storage Systems" unless required by this 7Section.8    (d) If a county has elected to establish standards under 9subsection (b), then the zoning board of appeals for the 10county shall hold at least one public hearing before the 11county grants (i) siting approval or a special use permit for 12an energy storage system or (ii) modification of an approved 13siting or special use permit. The public hearing shall be 14conducted in accordance with the Open Meetings Act and shall 15conclude not more than 60 days after the filing of the 16application for the facility. The county shall allow 17interested parties to a special use permit an opportunity to 18present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses at the 19hearing, but the county may impose reasonable restrictions on 20the public hearing, including reasonable time limitations on 21the presentation of evidence and the cross-examination of 22witnesses. The county shall also allow public comment at the 23public hearing in accordance with the Open Meetings Act. The 24county shall make its siting and permitting decisions not more 25than 30 days after the conclusion of the public hearing. 26Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of   SB3409- 6 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1general circulation in the county.2    (e) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 3with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to comply 4with this Section within 120 days after the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.6    (f) A county shall require an energy storage system to be 7sited as follows, with setback distances measured from the 8nearest edge of the nearest battery or other electrochemical 9or electromechanical enclosure: 10Setback Description           Setback Distance 11Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest 12Buildings and                 point of the outside wall of13Nonparticipating Residences   the occupied community building14                              or nonparticipating residence 15Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest point16Occupied Community            on the property line of17Buildings and                 the occupied community building18Nonparticipating Residences   or nonparticipating property 19Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest edge20                              of the right-of-way21        (2) A county shall also require an energy storage 22    system to be sited so that the facility's perimeter is   SB3409- 7 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    enclosed by fencing having a height of at least 7 feet and 2    no more than 25 feet.3    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 4electric facility clearances approved or required by the 5National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety Code, 6the Illinois Commerce Commission, the Federal Energy 7Regulatory Commission, and their designees or successors.8    (g) A county may not set a sound limitation for energy 9storage systems that is more restrictive than the sound 10limitations established by the Illinois Pollution Control 11Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 901, and 910. After 12commercial operation, a county may require the facility owner 13to provide, not more than once, octave band sound pressure 14level measurements from a reasonable number of sampled 15locations at the perimeter of the energy storage system to 16demonstrate compliance with this Section.17    (h) The provisions set forth in subsection (f) may be 18waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 19affected nonparticipating property or nonparticipating 20residence.21    (i) A county may not place any restriction on the 22installation or use of an energy storage system unless it has 23formed a zoning commission and adopted formal zoning under 24Section 5-12007 and adopts an ordinance that complies with 25this Section. A county may not establish siting standards for 26supporting facilities that preclude development of an energy   SB3409- 8 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1storage system.2    (j) A request for siting approval or a special use permit 3for an energy storage system, or modification of an approved 4siting approval or special use permit, shall be approved if 5the request complies with the standards and conditions imposed 6in this Code, the zoning ordinance adopted consistent with 7this Section, and other State and federal statutes and 8regulations. The siting approval or special use permit 9approved by the county shall grant the facility owner a period 10of at least 3 years after county approval to obtain a building 11permit or commence construction of the energy storage system, 12before the siting approval or special use permit may become 13subject to revocation by the county. Facility owners may be 14granted an extension on obtaining building permits or 15commencing constructing upon a showing of good cause. A 16facility owner's request for an extension may not be 17unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or denied.18    (k) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 19disallow, permanently or temporarily, an energy storage system 20from being developed or operated in any district zones to 21allow agricultural or industrial uses.22    (l) A facility owner shall file a farmland drainage plan 23with the county and impacted drainage districts that outlines 24how surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be 25restored during and following the construction or 26deconstruction of the energy storage system. The plan shall be   SB3409- 9 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1created independently by the facility owner and shall include 2the location of any potentially impacted drainage district 3facilities to the extent the information is publicly available 4from the county or the drainage district, plans to repair any 5subsurface drainage affected during construction or 6deconstruction using procedures outlined in the agricultural 7impact mitigation agreement entered into by the facility 8owner, and procedures for the repair and restoration of 9surface drainage affected during construction or 10deconstruction and plans to repair any subsurface drainage 11affected during construction or deconstruction using 12procedures outlined in the decommissioning plan. All surface 13and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 14practicable.15    (m) A facility owner shall compensate landowners for crop 16losses or other agricultural damages resulting from damage to 17a drainage system caused by the construction or deconstruction 18of an energy storage system. The facility owner shall repair 19or pay for the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage 20system caused by the construction of the energy storage 21system. The facility owner shall repair or pay for the repair 22and restoration of surface drainage caused by the construction 23or deconstruction of the energy storage facility as soon as 24reasonably practicable. 25    (n) County siting approval or special use permit 26application fees for an energy storage system shall not exceed   SB3409- 10 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1the lesser of (i) $5,000 per each megawatt of nameplate 2capacity of the energy storage system or (ii) $50,000.3    (o) The county shall may require a facility owner to 4provide a decommissioning plan to the county that complies 5with the Department of Agriculture's standard energy storage 6system agricultural impact mitigation agreement. The 7decommissioning plan may include all requirements for 8decommissioning plans in NFPA 855 and may also require the 9facility owner to:10        (1) state how the energy storage system will be 11    decommissioned, including removal to a depth of 5 3 feet 12    of all structures that have no ongoing purpose and all 13    debris and restoration of the soil and any vegetation to a 14    condition as close as reasonably practicable to the soil's 15    and vegetation's preconstruction condition within 12 18 16    months of the end of project life or facility abandonment;17        (2) include provisions related to commercially 18    reasonable efforts to reuse or recycle of equipment and 19    components associated with the commercial offsite energy 20    storage system;21        (3) include financial assurance in the form of a 22    reclamation or surety bond or other commercially available 23    financial assurance that is acceptable to the county in an 24    amount that shall be in accordance with the financial 25    assurance required by the Department of Agriculture's 26    standard energy storage system agricultural impact   SB3409- 11 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    mitigation agreement; , with the county or participating 2    property owner as beneficiary. The amount of the financial 3    assurance shall not be more than the estimated cost of 4    decommissioning the energy facility, after deducting 5    salvage value, as calculated by a professional engineer 6    licensed to practice engineering in this State with 7    expertise in preparing decommissioning estimates, retained 8    by the applicant. The financial assurance shall be 9    provided to the county incrementally as follows:10            (A) 25% before the start of full commercial 11        operation;12            (B) 50% before the start of the 5th year of 13        commercial operation; and14            (C) 100% by the start of the tenth year of 15        commercial operation;16        (4) update the amount of the financial assurance not 17    more than every 5 years for the duration of commercial 18    operations. The amount shall be calculated by a 19    professional engineer licensed to practice engineering in 20    this State with expertise in decommissioning, hired by the 21    facility owner; and22        (5) decommission the energy storage system, in 23    accordance with an approved decommissioning plan, within 24    18 months after abandonment. An energy storage system that 25    has not stored electrical energy for 12 consecutive months 26    or that fails, for a period of 6 consecutive months, to pay   SB3409- 12 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    a property owner who is party to a written agreement, 2    including, but not limited to, an easement, option, lease, 3    or license under the terms of which an energy storage 4    system is constructed on the property, amounts owed in 5    accordance with the written agreement shall be considered 6    abandoned, except when the inability to store energy is 7    the result of an event of force majeure or excused service 8    interruption.9    (p) A county may not condition approval of an energy 10storage system on a property value guarantee and may not 11require a facility owner to pay into a neighboring property 12devaluation escrow account.13    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide the 14results and recommendations from consultation with the 15Department of Natural Resources that are obtained through the 16Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool (EcoCAT) or a comparable 17successor tool.18    (r) A county may require an energy storage system to 19adhere to the recommendations provided by the Department of 20Natural Resources in an Agency Action Report under 17 Ill. 21Adm. Code 1075.22    (s) A county may require a facility owner to:23        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 24    identified by the Department of Natural Resources and the 25    Illinois Nature Preserves Commission; or26        (2) consider the recommendations of the Department of   SB3409- 13 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    Natural Resources for setbacks from protected lands, 2    including areas identified by the Illinois Nature 3    Preserves Commission.4    (t) A county may require that a facility owner provide 5evidence of consultation with the Illinois Historic 6Preservation Division to assess potential impacts on 7State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 8Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act.9    (u) A county may require that an application for siting 10approval or special use permit include the following 11information on a site plan:12        (1) a description of the property lines and physical 13    features, including roads, for the facility site;14        (2) a description of the proposed changes to the 15    landscape of the facility site, including vegetation 16    clearing and planting, exterior lighting, and screening or 17    structures; and18        (3) a description of the zoning district designation 19    for the parcel of land comprising the facility site.20    (v) A county may not prohibit an energy storage system 21from undertaking periodic augmentation to maintain the 22approximate original capacity of the energy storage system. A 23county may not require renewed or additional siting approval 24or special use permit approval of periodic augmentation to 25maintain the approximate original capacity of the energy 26storage system.  SB3409- 14 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    (w) A county that issues a building permit for energy 2storage systems shall review and process building permit 3applications within 60 days after receipt of the building 4permit application. If a county does not grant or deny the 5building permit application within 60 days, the building 6permit shall be deemed granted. If a county denies a building 7permit application, it shall specify the reason for the denial 8in writing as part of its denial.9    (x) A county may require a single building permit and a 10reasonable permit fee for the facility which includes all 11supporting facilities. A county building permit fee for an 12energy storage system that does not exceed the lesser of (i) 13$5,000 per each megawatt of nameplate capacity of the energy 14storage system or (ii) $50,000 shall be considered 15presumptively reasonable. A county may require that the 16application for building permit contain:17        (1) an electrical diagram detailing the battery energy 18    storage system layout, associated components, and 19    electrical interconnection methods, with all National 20    Electrical Code compliant disconnects and overcurrent 21    devices; and22        (2) an equipment specification sheet.23    (y) A county shall may require the facility owner to 24submit to the county prior to the facility's commercial 25operation a commissioning report meeting the requirements of 26NFPA 855 Sections 4.2.4, 6.1.3, and 6.1.5.5, as published in   SB3409- 15 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b12023, or the applicable Sections in the most recent version of 2NFPA 855.3    (z) A county shall may require the facility owner to 4submit to the county prior to the facility's commercial 5operation a hazard mitigation analysis meeting the 6requirements of NFPA 855 Section 4.4 or the applicable 7Sections in the most recent version of NFPA 855.8    (aa) A county shall may require the facility owner to 9submit to the county an emergency operations plan meeting the 10requirements of NFPA 855 Section 4.3.2.1.4, published in 2023, 11or applicable Sections in the most recent version of NFPA 855, 12prior to commercial operation.13    (bb) A county shall may require a warning that complies 14with requirements in NFPA 855 Section 4.7.4, published in 152023, or applicable sections in the most recent version of 16NFPA 855.17    (cc) A county may require the energy storage system to 18adhere to the principles for responsible outdoor lighting 19provided by the International Dark-Sky Association and shall 20limit outdoor lighting to that which is minimally required for 21safety and operational purposes. Any outdoor lighting shall be 22reasonably shielded and downcast from all residences and 23adjacent properties.24    (dd) This Section does not exempt compliance with fire and 25safety standards and guidance established for the installation 26of lithium-ion battery energy storage systems set by the NFPA.  SB3409- 16 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    (ee) Prior to commencement of commercial operation, the 2facility owner shall offer to provide training for local fire 3departments and emergency responders in accordance with the 4facility emergency operations plan. A copy of the emergency 5operations plan shall be given to the facility owner, the 6local fire department, and emergency responders. All batteries 7integrated within an energy storage system shall be listed 8under the UL 1973 Standard. All batteries integrated within an 9energy storage system shall be listed in accordance with UL 109540 Standard, either from the manufacturer or by a field 11evaluation.12    (ff) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 13with the Department of Transportation, a road district, or 14other unit of local government relating to an energy storage 15system, then the road use agreement shall require the facility 16owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 17improving, if necessary, roads used by the facility owner to 18construct the energy storage system and (ii) the reasonable 19cost of repairing roads used by the facility owner during 20construction of the energy storage system so that those roads 21are in a condition that is safe for the driving public after 22the completion of the facility's construction. A roadway 23improved in preparation for and during the construction of the 24energy storage system shall be repaired and restored to the 25improved condition at the reasonable cost of the developer if 26the roadways have degraded or were damaged as a result of   SB3409- 17 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1construction-related activities.2    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 3owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 4specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 5the energy storage system. No road district or other unit of 6local government may request or require a fine, permit fee, or 7other payment obligation as a requirement for a road use 8agreement with a facility owner unless the amount of the fine, 9permit fee, or other payment obligation is equivalent to the 10amount of actual expenses incurred by the road district or 11other unit of local government for negotiating, executing, 12constructing, or implementing the road use agreement. The road 13use agreement shall not require the facility owner to perform 14or pay for any road work that is unrelated to the road 15improvements required for the construction of the commercial 16wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 17or the restoration of the roads used by the facility owner 18during construction-related activities.19    (gg) The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 20General Assembly do not apply to an application for siting 21approval or special use permit for an energy storage system if 22the application was submitted to a county before the effective 23date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.24(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 25    Section 10. The Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural   SB3409- 18 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1Impact Mitigation Act is amended by changing Sections 10 and 215 as follows: 3    (505 ILCS 147/10)4    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 5    "Abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility" means 6when deconstruction has not been completed within 18 months 7after the commercial wind energy facility reaches the end of 8its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial 9wind energy facility will be presumed to have reached the end 10of its useful life if (1) no electricity is generated for a 11continuous period of 12 months and (2) the commercial wind 12energy facility owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive 13months, to pay the landowner amounts owed in accordance with 14the underlying agreement.15    "Abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility" means 16when deconstruction has not been completed within 12 months 17after the commercial solar energy facility reaches the end of 18its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial 19solar energy facility shall be presumed to have reached the 20end of its useful life if the commercial solar energy facility 21owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive months, to pay the 22landowner amounts owed in accordance with the underlying 23agreement. 24    "Abandonment of an energy storage system" means when 25deconstruction has not been completed within 12 months after   SB3409- 19 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1the energy storage system reaches the end of its useful life. 2For purposes of this definition, an energy storage system 3shall be presumed to have reached the end of its useful life if 4(1) the energy storage system has not stored electrical energy 5for a continuous period of 12 months or (2) the energy storage 6system owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive months, to 7pay the landowner amounts owed in accordance with the 8underlying agreement. 9    "Agricultural impact mitigation agreement" means an 10agreement between the commercial wind energy facility owner, 11or the commercial solar energy facility owner, or the energy 12storage system owner and the Department of Agriculture 13described in Section 15 of this Act. 14    "Commercial renewable energy facility " means a commercial 15wind energy facility, or commercial solar energy facility, or 16energy storage system as defined in this Act. 17    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a solar energy 18conversion facility equal to or greater than 500 kilowatts in 19total nameplate capacity, including a solar energy conversion 20facility seeking an extension of a permit to construct granted 21by a county or municipality before the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. "Commercial 23solar energy facility" does not include a solar energy 24conversion facility: (1) for which a permit to construct has 25been issued before the effective date of this amendatory Act 26of the 100th General Assembly; (2) that is located on land   SB3409- 20 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1owned by the commercial solar energy facility owner; (3) that 2was constructed before the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 100th General Assembly; or (4) that is located on 4the customer side of the customer's electric meter and is 5primarily used to offset that customer's electricity load and 6is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or equal to 2,000 7kilowatts. 8    "Commercial solar energy facility owner" means a private 9commercial enterprise that owns a commercial solar energy 10facility. A commercial solar energy facility owner is not nor 11shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in the 12Public Utilities Act.13    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 14conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 15total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 16facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 17an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 18municipality before the effective date of this Act. 19"Commercial wind energy facility" does not include a wind 20energy conversion facility: (1) that has submitted a complete 21permit application to a county or municipality and for which 22the hearing on the completed application has commenced on the 23date provided in the public hearing notice, which must be 24before the effective date of this Act; (2) for which a permit 25to construct has been issued before the effective date of this 26Act; or (3) that was constructed before the effective date of   SB3409- 21 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1this Act.2    "Commercial wind energy facility owner" means a private 3commercial enterprise that owns or operates a commercial wind 4energy facility. A commercial wind energy facility owner is 5not nor shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in 6the Public Utilities Act. 7    "Construction" means the installation, preparation for 8installation, or repair of a commercial renewable energy 9facility. 10    "County" means the county where the commercial renewable 11energy facility is located. 12    "Deconstruction" means the removal of a commercial 13renewable energy facility from the property of a landowner and 14the restoration of that property as provided in the 15agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 16    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. 17    "Energy storage system" means a facility with an aggregate 18energy capacity that is greater than 500 kilowatts and that is 19capable of absorbing energy and storing it for use at a later 20time, including, but not limited to, electrochemical and 21electromechanical technologies. "Energy storage system" does 22not include technologies that require combustion. 23    "Energy storage system owner" means a private commercial 24enterprise that owns an energy storage system. An energy 25storage system owner is not nor shall it be deemed to be a 26public utility as defined in the Public Utilities Act.   SB3409- 22 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1    "Landowner" means any person (1) with an ownership 2interest in property that is used for agricultural purposes 3and (2) that is a party to an underlying agreement. 4    "Underlying agreement" means the written agreement with a 5landowner, including, but not limited to, an easement, option, 6lease, or license, under the terms of which another person has 7constructed, constructs, or intends to construct a commercial 8wind energy facility, or commercial solar energy facility, or 9energy storage system on the property of the landowner.10(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.) 11    (505 ILCS 147/15)12    Sec. 15. Agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 13    (a) A commercial renewable energy facility owner of a 14commercial wind energy facility, or a commercial solar energy 15facility, or an energy storage system that is located on 16landowner property shall enter into an agricultural impact 17mitigation agreement with the Department outlining 18construction and deconstruction standards and policies 19designed to preserve the integrity of any agricultural land 20that is impacted by commercial renewable energy facility 21construction and deconstruction. The construction and 22deconstruction of any commercial solar energy facility or 23energy storage system shall be in conformance with the 24Department's standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement 25referenced in subsection (f) of this Section. Except as   SB3409- 23 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1provided in subsection (a-5) of this Section, the terms and 2conditions of the Department's standard agricultural impact 3mitigation agreement are subject to and may be modified by an 4underlying agreement between the landowner and the commercial 5solar energy facility owner. 6    (a-5) Prior to the commencement of construction, a 7commercial solar energy facility owner or energy storage 8system owner shall submit to the county in which the 9commercial solar facility or energy storage system is to be 10located a deconstruction plan. A commercial solar energy 11facility owner or energy storage system owner shall provide 12the county with an appropriate financial assurance mechanism 13consistent with the Department's standard agricultural impact 14mitigation agreement for and to assure deconstruction in the 15event of an abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility 16or energy storage system. 17    (b) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 18commercial wind energy facility shall include, but is not 19limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 20affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 21abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility), 22construction staging, and storage areas; support structures; 23aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; underground 24cabling depth; topsoil replacement; protection and repair of 25agricultural drainage tiles; rock removal; repair of 26compaction and rutting; land leveling; prevention of soil   SB3409- 24 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1erosion; repair of damaged soil conservation practices; 2compensation for damages to private property; clearing of 3trees and brush; interference with irrigation systems; access 4roads; weed control; pumping of water from open excavations; 5advance notice of access to private property; indemnification 6of landowners; and deconstruction plans and financial 7assurance for deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a 8commercial wind energy facility). 9    (b-5) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 10commercial solar energy facility shall include, but is not 11limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 12affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 13abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility); support 14structures; aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; 15underground cabling depth; topsoil removal and replacement; 16rerouting and permanent repair of agricultural drainage tiles; 17rock removal; repair of compaction and rutting; construction 18during wet weather; land leveling; prevention of soil erosion; 19repair of damaged soil conservation practices; compensation 20for damages to private property; clearing of trees and brush; 21access roads; weed control; advance notice of access to 22private property; indemnification of landowners; and 23deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 24deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 25solar energy facility). The commercial solar energy facility 26owner shall enter into one agricultural impact mitigation   SB3409- 25 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1agreement for each commercial solar energy facility. 2    (b-10) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for an 3energy storage system shall include, but shall not be limited 4to, plans for the restoration of agricultural land affected by 5construction, deconstruction, including upon abandonment of an 6energy storage system; plans for support structures; plans for 7aboveground facilities; plans for guy wires and anchors; plans 8for underground cabling depth; plans for topsoil removal and 9replacement; plans for rerouting and permanent repair of 10agricultural drainage tiles; plans for rock removal; plans for 11repairing of compaction and rutting; plans for construction 12during wet weather; plans for land leveling; plans for the 13prevention of soil erosion; plans for repairing damaged soil 14conservation practices; plans for compensation for any damages 15to private property; plans for the clearing of trees and 16brush; plans for access roads; plans for weed control; plans 17for providing advance notice of access to private property; 18plans for indemnification of landowners; and the 19deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 20deconstruction, including upon abandonment of an energy 21storage system. The energy storage system owner shall enter 22into one agricultural impact mitigation agreement for each 23energy storage system. 24    (c) For commercial wind energy facility owners or energy 25storage system owners seeking seeking a permit from a county 26or municipality for the construction of a commercial wind   SB3409- 26 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1energy facility or energy storage system, the agricultural 2impact mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to the 3public hearing required prior to a siting decision of a county 4or municipality regarding the commercial wind energy facility 5or energy storage system. The agricultural impact mitigation 6agreement is binding on any subsequent commercial wind energy 7facility owner or energy storage system owner that takes 8ownership of the commercial wind energy facility or energy 9storage system that is the subject of the agreement. 10    (c-5) A commercial solar energy facility owner shall, not 11less than 45 days prior to commencement of actual 12construction, submit to the Department a standard agricultural 13impact mitigation agreement as referenced in subsection (f) of 14this Section signed by the commercial solar energy facility 15owner and including all information required by the 16Department. The commercial solar energy facility owner shall 17provide either a copy of that submitted agreement or a copy of 18the fully executed project-specific agricultural impact 19mitigation agreement to the landowner not less than 30 days 20prior to the commencement of construction. The agricultural 21impact mitigation agreement is binding on any subsequent 22commercial solar energy facility owner that takes ownership of 23the commercial solar energy facility that is the subject of 24the agreement. 25    (c-10) A commercial renewable energy facility owner shall 26make available a copy of the signed agricultural impact   SB3409- 27 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1mitigation agreement at the site of the commercial renewable 2energy facility during any construction or deconstruction 3activities. All contractors or subcontractors shall be trained 4on the requirements included in the signed agricultural impact 5mitigation agreement. 6    (d) If a commercial renewable energy facility owner seeks 7an extension of a permit granted by a county or municipality 8for the construction of a commercial wind energy facility 9prior to the effective date of this Act, the agricultural 10impact mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to a 11decision by the county or municipality to grant the permit 12extension. 13    (e) The Department may adopt rules that are necessary and 14appropriate for the implementation and administration of 15agricultural impact mitigation agreements as required under 16this Act. 17    (f) The Department shall make available on its website a 18standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement applicable 19to all commercial solar energy facilities within 60 days after 20the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 21Assembly. 22    (g) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 100th General 23Assembly and nothing in an agricultural impact mitigation 24agreement shall be construed to apply to or otherwise impair 25an underlying agreement for a commercial solar energy facility 26entered into prior to the effective date of this amendatory   SB3409- 28 -LRB104 20578 RTM 34066 b1Act of the 100th General Assembly. 2(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.)